Utah statutes.
61-1-23.   Review of orders.
A person aggrieved by a final order under this chapter determining all of the
issues of an adjudicative proceeding may obtain review of the order by the
executive director in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative
Procedures Act.
